Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.240

Bureaus—Examinations.

The director is empowered to examine the bureau operations of an alien bank whenever he or she deems it necessary. The director shall collect from such alien bank the estimated actual cost of such examination.

[ 1994 c 92 s 96; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 24. Formerly RCW 30.42.240.]